Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-193
County attorney; powers; filing of
ordinances.

A
county attorney may sign and prosecute a complaint in the county court for
a violation of an ordinance of the county in which he or she serves as county
attorney. No county may prosecute a complaint for a violation of an ordinance
unless such county has on file with the court a current copy of the ordinances
of such county. Subject to guidelines provided by the State Court Administrator,
the court shall prescribe the form in which such ordinances shall be filed.

Laws 2009, LB532, § 7.